src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-jeäqmed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jeäʹmed 2b or D-supistuma emäntä: # Noun - full paradigm
     jeäʹmed+N+Sg+Nom: jeäʹmed
     jeäʹmed+N+Sg+Gen: jeäʹmed
     jeäʹmed+N+Sg+Acc: jeäʹmed
     jeäʹmed+N+Sg+Ill: [jeäʹmää, jeäʹmda]
     jeäʹmed+N+Sg+Loc: [jeäʹmeest, jeäʹmdest]
     jeäʹmed+N+Sg+Com: [jeäʹmiin, jeäʹmdin]
     jeäʹmed+N+Ess: [jeäʹmeen, jeäʹmden]
     jeäʹmed+N+Par: [jeäʹmeed, jeäʹmded]
     jeäʹmed+N+Sg+Abe: [jeäʹmedtaa, jeäʹmedtää]
     jeäʹmed+N+Pl+Nom: jeäʹmed
     jeäʹmed+N+Pl+Gen: [jeäʹmii, jeäʹmdi]
     jeäʹmed+N+Pl+Acc: [jeäʹmiid, jeäʹmdid]
     jeäʹmed+N+Pl+Ill: [jeäʹmiid, jeäʹmdid]
     jeäʹmed+N+Pl+Loc: [jeäʹmiin, jeäʹmdin]
     jeäʹmed+N+Pl+Com: [jeäʹmiivuiʹm, jeäʹmdivuiʹm]
     jeäʹmed+N+Pl+Abe: [jeäʹmiitää, jeäʹmiitaa, jeäʹmditää, jeäʹmditaa]
